fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Suspensioharjoitteluvälineet > Suspensioharjoittelun lisävälineet: Hihnanjatkeet; Suspensioharjoitteluankkurit; Suspensioharjoittelukarabiinit; Suspensioharjoitteluliittimet; Suspensioharjoittelukiinnikkeet
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Suspenzijski trenažeri > Pribor za suspenzijski trening: Produžeci za pojas; Sidra za suspenzijske trenažere; Karabineri za suspenzijske trenažere; Konektori za suspenzijske trenažere; Nosači za suspenzijske trenažere
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Fitas de suspensão > Acessórios de treinamento de suspensão: Extensores de correia; Ganchos para treinamento de suspensão; Mosquetões para treinamento de suspensão; Conectores para treinamento de suspensão; Suportes para treinamento de suspensão
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Đai treo > Phụ kiện tập luyện treo: Bộ mở rộng dây đeo; Neo tập luyện treo; Móc tập luyện treo; Đầu nối tập luyện treo; Giá gắn tập luyện treo
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Sistemas de entrenamiento en suspensión > Accesorios para entrenamiento en suspensión: Extensores de correa; Anclajes de entrenamiento en suspensión; Mosquetones de entrenamiento en suspensión; Conectores de entrenamiento en suspensión; Soportes de entrenamiento en suspensión
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Pasy treningowe > Akcesoria do treningu w zawieszeniu: Przedłużacze pasów; Kotwy do treningu w zawieszeniu; Karabinki do treningu w zawieszeniu; Złącza do treningu w zawieszeniu; Mocowania do treningu w zawieszeniu
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Suspension Trainers > Suspension Training Accessories: Strap Extenders; Suspension Training Anchors; Suspension Training Carabiners; Suspension Training Connectors; Suspension Training Mounts
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 悬挂训练设备 > 悬挂训练配件: 绑带延长带; 悬挂训练锚; 悬挂训练钩环; 悬挂训练连接头; 悬挂训练架
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Ιμάντες αιώρησης για προπόνηση > Αξεσουάρ προπόνησης με αναρτήσεις: Προεκτάσεις ιμάντων; Άγκιστρα για τοποθέτηση συστημάτων προπόνησης με αναρτήσεις; Καραμπίνερ προπόνησης με αναρτήσεις; Συνδέσεις προπόνησης με αναρτήσεις; Βάσεις προπόνησης με αναρτήσεις
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Функциональные петли > Аксессуары для функциональных петель: Удлинители для ремней; Крепления на дверь для функциональных петель; Карабины для функциональных петель; Соединители для функциональных петель; Кронштейны для функциональных петель
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > อุปกรณ์ฝึกประเภทสาย > อุปกรณ์เสริมการฝึกประเภทสาย: สายรัดต่อขยาย; จุดถ่วงในการฝึกประเภทสาย; ห่วงเกี่ยวนิรภัยในการฝึกประเภทสาย; หัวต่อในการฝึกประเภทสาย; ที่ยึดในการฝึกประเภทสาย
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Elastiktræning > Ophængstræningstilbehør: Stropforlængere; Ophængstræningsankre; Ophængstræningskarabiner; Ophængstræningskonnektorer; Ophængstræningsbeslag
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Vadbeni trakovi > Dodatki za vadbo s trakovi: Podaljški za trakove; Sidra za vadbo s trakovi; Karabini za vadbo s trakovi; Priključki za vadbo s trakovi; Nosilci za vadbo s trakovi
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Závěsné tréninkové systémy > Závěsný trénink – příslušenství: Prodlužovací popruhy; Závěsný trénink – kotvení; Závěsný trénink – karabiny; Závěsný trénink – spojky; Závěsný trénink – držáky
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Suspensiontrainers > Suspensiontrainingshulpmiddelen: Bandjesverlengers; Suspensiontrainingsankers; Suspensiontrainingskarabijnhaken; Suspensiontrainingsconnectoren; Suspensiontrainingssteunen
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Suspension Trainer > Suspension-Trainingszubehör: Gurtverlängerungen; Verankerungen fürs Suspensionstraining; Karabiner fürs Suspensionstraining; Verbindungselemente fürs Suspensionstraining; Befestigungselemente fürs Suspensionstraining
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Sangles de suspension > Accessoires d’entraînement en suspension: Rallonges de sangle; Ancrages d’entraînement en suspension; Mousquetons d’entraînement en suspension; Connecteurs d’entraînement en suspension; Supports d’entraînement en suspension
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 서스펜션 트레이너 > 서스펜션 트레이닝 부대용품: 스트랩 연장용품; 서스펜션 트레이닝 앵커; 서스펜션 트레이닝 카라비너; 서스펜션 트레이닝 연결장치; 서스펜션 트레이닝 설치대
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Kabamieji treniruokliai > Kabamųjų treniruočių priedai: Diržų ilgintuvai; Kabamųjų treniruočių inkarai; Kabamųjų treniruočių karabinai; Kabamųjų treniruočių jungtys; Kabamųjų treniruočių laikikliai
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Felfüggesztési trénerek > Felfüggesztési edzőkiegészítők: Pánthosszabbítók; Felfüggesztési edzőhorgok; Felfüggesztési edzőkarabinerek; Felfüggesztési edzőcsatlakozók; Felfüggesztési edzőtartók
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Egzersiz Askıları > Süspansiyon Eğitim Aksesuarları: Askı Uzatıcıları; Süspansiyon Eğitimi Dübelleri; Süspansiyon Eğitim Karabinaları; Süspansiyon Eğitim Konnektörleri; Süspansiyon Eğitimi Montaj Parçaları
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > サスペンショントレーナー > サスペンショントレーニング関連用品: ストラップエクステンダー; サスペンショントレーニングアンカー; サスペンショントレーニング カラビナ; サスペンショントレーニング コネクター; サスペンショントレーニング マウント
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Redskap för suspensionsträning > Suspensionsträningstillbehör: Remförlängare; Suspensionsträningsankare; Suspensionsträningskarbinhakar; Suspensionsträningsanslutare; Suspensionsträningsfästen
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Attrezzi per allenamento in sospensione > Accessori per allenamento in sospensione: Prolunghe per cinturino; Ancore per allenamento in sospensione; Moschettoni per allenamento in sospensione; Connettori per allenamento in sospensione; Supporti per allenamento in sospensione
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Equipamentos de treino de suspensão > Acessórios para treino de suspensão: Extensões de faixas; Âncoras para treino de suspensão; Mosquetões para treino de suspensão; Conectores para treino de suspensão; Suportes para treino de suspensão
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Závesné trenažéry > Príslušenstvo pre závesný systém: Predlžovacie popruhy; Kotvy pre závesný systém; Karabíny pre závesný systém; Spojky pre závesný systém; Držiaky pre závesný systém
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 懸掛訓練繩 > 懸掛訓練配件: 延長背帶; 懸掛訓練錨; 懸掛訓練登山扣; 懸掛訓練接頭; 懸掛訓練安裝支架
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Articole pentru antrenamente de suspensie > Accesorii pentru antrenamente de suspensie: Prelungitoare pentru curele; Ancore pentru antrenamente de suspensie; Carabiniere pentru antrenamente de suspensie; Conectori pentru antrenamente de suspensie; Sisteme de montare pentru antrenamente de suspensie
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Suspensjonstrenere > Tilbehør for opphengstrening: Stroppforlengere; Ankere for opphengstrening; Karabinere for opphengstrening; Koblinger for opphengstrening; Fester for opphengstrening
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Тренировъчни системи за окачване > Аксесоари за тренировки с окачване: Удължители за презрамки; Анкер халки за монтаж на въжета за тренировки с окачване; Карабинери за тренировки с окачване; Съединители за тренировки с окачване; Стойки за тренировки с окачване